Utah statutes.
10-6-105.   Fiscal period -- Annual or biennial.
(1)  Except as provided in Subsection (2), the fiscal period for each city
shall be an annual period beginning July 1 of each year and ending June 30 of
the following year.
(2) (a)  Notwithstanding Subsection (1), the legislative body of a city may,
by ordinance, adopt for the city a fiscal period that is a biennial period
beginning July 1 and ending June 30 of the second following calendar year.
(b)  Each city adopting an ordinance under Subsection (2)(a) shall separately
specify in its budget the amount of ad valorem property tax it intends to levy
and collect during both the first half and the second half of the budget
period.
(c)  Each city that adopts a fiscal period that is a biennial period under
Subsection (2)(a) shall:
(i)  comply with Sections 59-2-912 through 59-2-926 as if it had adopted a
fiscal period that is an annual period; and
(ii)  allocate budgeted revenues and expenditures to each of the two annual
periods in the biennial budget.
(d)  The legislative body of each city that adopts a fiscal period that is a
biennial period under Subsection (2)(a) shall, within ten days after the
adoption of the ordinance adopting the biennial period, deliver a copy of the
ordinance to the state auditor.
